test/tools/fsmbook-examples/BetterColaMachine/BetterColaMachine.hfst.script
#
# $1 is the transducer format

# identity
echo "[?]" | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > Solution

for i in '[ D -> N^2, Q -> N^5 ]' \
         'N^5/\N @-> ...  "[COLA]"' \
  	 'N -> 0 || _ $"[COLA]"' \
	 'N^2/\N @-> ...  D' \
	 'N -> 0 || _ $D'; do
  echo $i | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 | $TOOLDIR/hfst-compose -1 Solution > TMP;
  mv TMP Solution;
done

mv Solution BetterColaMachine.hfst.hfst
